Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Article 4. Disposal of Timber.

Administrative Code. —

For timber and material sales, see 11 AAC 71.

Sec. 38.05.110.
Sale of timber; timber receipts account.

The commissioner shall provide for cruises of timber on state land and shall assess the supply of and current markets for timber on privately owned land in close proximity to state land to determine

the timber that should be offered for sale; and

the terms of sale of the timber.

The timber receipts account is established in the state treasury. The revenue from the sale of timber from state land shall be deposited in the timber receipts account. Subject to appropriation, the commissioner shall provide 25 percent of the revenue from a sale of timber under this section to forestry programs operated by the department in the municipality, reserve, or community in which the timber was harvested or, if the timber was not harvested in a municipality, reserve, or community, the municipality, reserve, or community closest to the area where the timber was harvested. The legislature may also appropriate money deposited into the timber receipts account for implementation of the state timber disposal program by the department or for any other public purpose.

If a sale of timber may be offered under multiple provisions of AS

38.05.110

—

38.05.123

, the commissioner shall determine the applicable provisions under which to offer the timber.

History.

(§ 1 art VI ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 31 ch 152 SLA 1984; am § 4 ch 63 SLA 2000; am § 13 ch 27 SLA 2012; am §§ 1, 2 ch 42 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For timber and material sale procedures, see 11 AAC 71, art. 1.

For timber and material sale contracts and operations, see 11 AAC 71, art. 2.

For timber and logging requirements, see 11 AAC 71, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 20, 2016, in (b), substituted “land” for “lands”, added the second sentence, inserted “also” preceding “appropriate”; added (c).

Editor's notes. —

Under sec. 5, ch. 42, SLA 2016, the 2016 amendments to subsections (a) and (c) "apply to sales of timber on state land made on or after July 20, 2016".

Sec. 38.05.112.
Forest land use plans.

The department may not authorize the harvest of timber, except for harvests of 10 acres or less or timber salvaged from land cleared for a nonforest use, until a site-specific forest land use plan has been adopted. A forest land use plan is required whether or not a regional or area land use plan under AS

38.04.065(a)

or a forest management plan under AS

41.17.230

has been adopted. The requirements of AS

38.04.065(b)

shall apply to a land use plan adopted under this section only if a regional or area land use plan under AS

38.04.065(a)

or a forest management plan under AS

41.17.230

has not been adopted.

In adopting a forest land use plan, the commissioner shall consider the best available data, including information provided by other agencies.

In adopting a forest land use plan on lands not covered by a forest management plan under AS

41.17.230

, the commissioner shall consider non-timber uses and resources within the sale area.

History.

(§ 1 ch 34 SLA 1990; am §§ 1 — 3, 12 ch 122 SLA 1996; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 153 SLA 2003)

Sec. 38.05.113.
Five-year sale schedule.

Every two years, the department shall prepare a five-year schedule of timber sales planned on all land managed by the department. The timber sale schedule must provide a time line that identifies timber sales, their volumes, and their locations and must contain sufficient information to provide the public and the forest products industry with a basis to comment on proposed sale offerings.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, a proposed sale may not be held unless it has been included in one of the two five-year schedules immediately preceding the sale.

Sales of 160 acres or less and emergency sales are exempt from the requirements of this section.

[Repealed, § 16 ch 153 SLA 2003.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 34 SLA 1990; am §§ 4, 5 ch 122 SLA 1996; am §§ 4, 5, 16 ch 153 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For timber and material sale procedures, see 11 AAC 71, art. 1.

Sec. 38.05.115.
Limitations and conditions of sale.

The commissioner shall determine the timber to be sold and the limitations, conditions, and terms of sale. The limitations, conditions, and terms shall include the utilization, development, and maintenance of the sustained yield principle, subject to preference among other beneficial uses. The commissioner may negotiate sales of timber without advertisement and on the limitations, conditions, and terms that are considered to be in the best interests of the state. Within a one-year period, the commissioner may not negotiate a sale without advertisement to the same purchaser of more than 500 M.B.M. or equivalent other measure of timber.

Negotiated sales not exceeding 50 M.B.M. or the equivalent other measure of timber are exempt from the provisions of AS

34.15.150

.

The limitations of this section are not applicable to timber that becomes state property under the provisions of AS

45.50.210

—

45.50.235

.

History.

(§ 2 art VI ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 66 SLA 1969; am § 9 ch 257 SLA 1976; am §§ 2, 3 ch 73 SLA 1978; am § 32 ch 152 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 119 SLA 1986; am § 14 ch 27 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, the reference in paragraph (a)(2) of this section to “(3) of this subsection” was substituted for a reference to “(3) of this section” to correct a manifest error.

Administrative Code. —

For timber and material sale procedures, see 11 AAC 71, art. 1.

For timber and material sale contracts and operations, see 11 AAC 71, art. 2.

For timber and logging requirements, see 11 AAC 71, art. 3.

For unbranded or abandoned timber property sales, see 11 AAC 71, art. 4.

Sec. 38.05.117.
Salvage sales.

Notwithstanding the provisions of AS

38.05.113

, the commissioner, after making a written finding that the disposal will serve the best interests of the state, may offer for salvage sale timber stands that will lose substantial economic value because of insect or disease epidemics or fire, if not salvaged within two years. Timber on land to be cleared for conversion to nonforest uses also may be offered as a salvage sale.

History.

(§ 1 ch 6 SLA 1995)

Sec. 38.05.118.
Negotiated sales.

Notwithstanding AS

38.05.115

and

38.05.120

, and upon a finding that the sale is in the best interest of the state, the commissioner may negotiate a sale of timber to a local manufacturer of wood products or a user of wood fiber at appraised value. The period of a contract for a sale of timber negotiated under this section may not exceed 25 years. The contract shall provide that the appraised value of timber remaining to be harvested under the provisions of the contract shall be redetermined at least once every five years.

Notice of intent to negotiate a contract authorized by (a) of this section shall be given in accordance with AS

38.05.945

.

[Repealed, § 4 ch 42 SLA 2016.]

History.

(§ 4 ch 73 SLA 1978; am § 101 ch 6 SLA 1984; am §§ 33, 34 ch 152 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 6 SLA 1995; am §§
3, 4 ch 42 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For timber and material sale procedures, see 11 AAC 71, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 20, 2016, in (a), substituted “AS

38.05.115

and

38.05.120

, and upon a finding that the sale is in the best interest of the state” for “any other provision of AS

38.05.110

– 28.05.120”, inserted “of wood products or a user of wood fiber” preceding “at appraised value”; repealed (c).

Editor's notes. —

Under sec. 5, ch. 42, SLA 2016, the 2016 amendment to subsection (a) and the repeal of subsection (c) "apply to sales of timber on state land made on or after July 20, 2016".

Sec. 38.05.120.
Disposal procedure.

Timber shall be sold either by sealed bids or public auction, depending on which method is determined by the commissioner to be in the best interests of the state, to the highest qualified bidder as determined by the commissioner. An aggrieved bidder may appeal to the commissioner within five days after the sale for a review of the determination. The sale shall be conducted by the commissioner, and, at the time of sale, the successful bidder shall deposit the amount specified in the terms of sale. The means by which the amount of deposit is determined shall be prescribed by appropriate regulation. The commissioner shall immediately issue a receipt containing a description of the timber purchased, the price bid, and the terms of sale. The receipt shall be accepted in writing by the bidder. A contract of sale, on a form approved by the attorney general, shall be signed by the purchaser, and the contract shall be signed by the commissioner on behalf of the state. The commissioner may impose conditions, limitations, and terms considered necessary and proper to protect the interests of the state. Violation of any provision of this chapter or the terms of the contract of sale subjects the purchaser to appropriate legal action.

History.

(§ 3 art VI ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 13 ch 61 SLA 1960; am § 3 ch 137 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 200 SLA 1970; am § 35 ch 152 SLA 1984; am § 15 ch 27 SLA 2012)

Administrative Code. —

For timber and material sale procedures, see 11 AAC 71, art. 1.

For timber and material sale contracts and operations, see 11 AAC 71, art. 2.

For unbranded or abandoned timber property sales, see 11 AAC 71, art. 4.

For unitization, see 11 AAC 83, art. 3.

Sec. 38.05.123.
Negotiated timber sales for local manufacture of wood products.

Notwithstanding the provisions of AS

38.05.115

and

38.05.120

, and upon a finding that the sale is in the best interest of the state, the commissioner may negotiate a sale of timber for use in the local manufacture of high value-added wood products. A timber sale contract entered into under this section may provide for a harvest of up to 10,000,000 board feet of timber each year, consistent with sustained yield principles, and may be for a term of up to 10 years. Initial stumpage rates for a contract under this section shall be determined by negotiation but may not be less than the base price for the area as established under regulations adopted by the commissioner. A contract under this section must provide that stumpage rates shall be redetermined by negotiation at least once every three years during the term of the contract, to reflect changes in market conditions; the redetermined rates may not be less than the base price for the area as established under regulations adopted by the commissioner. The commissioner shall by regulation set a maximum number of contracts, but not less than two, per region of the state that may be negotiated each year under this section.

Notice of intent to negotiate a contract under this section shall be given in accordance with AS

38.05.945

.

The commissioner may negotiate a sale of timber under this section if the prospective purchaser agrees to use to the maximum extent commercially practicable the timber subject to the sale for the local manufacture of high value-added wood products. The commissioner shall determine the maximum amount of the timber being sold that is commercially practicable to use for those purposes and make the use of that percentage of the timber for those purposes a term of the contract. In evaluating proposals, the commissioner shall take into account the proposed manufacture of other value-added wood products to be produced under a negotiated contract.

Before a sale may be negotiated under this section,

the area of the sale must be designated for forestry purposes or other purposes that permit forestry uses by a valid existing area plan adopted under AS 38.04; and

the requirements of AS

38.05.112

and

38.05.113

must be met.

In making the best interest finding required by AS

38.05.035(e)

and this section, the commissioner shall consider, in addition to other factors,

the direct economic benefit from the local manufacture of high value-added wood products as a result of the sale;

the direct economic benefit from other local processing of the timber to be undertaken by the purchaser as a result of the sale, including the manufacture of other value-added wood products in addition to high value-added wood products;

the likelihood of commercial success of the locally manufactured high value-added wood products and other value-added wood products;

the extent to which the sale is likely to result in the creation and maintenance of a stable local job base;

the existence of adequate protection measures to ensure the sustainability of fish and wildlife habitat and populations and continuation of other uses of the area subject to the negotiated sale;

the stumpage return to the state; and

any other reasonably foreseeable benefits to the state and local economies from the sale.

As part of the timber sale negotiations authorized by this section, the commissioner may require a prospective purchaser negotiating a timber sale contract to submit financial and technical data that demonstrates that the requirements of this section have been or will be met. Upon the prospective purchaser’s request, the commissioner shall keep data provided by the purchaser confidential in accordance with the requirements of AS

38.05.035(a)(8)

.

If the commissioner determines that additional analysis is necessary in order to complete the best interest finding for a sale under this section, the commissioner may require the prospective purchaser to retain and pay for the services of a contractor to assist the commissioner in evaluating the proposed negotiated sale and financial and technical data relating to the proposed sale. The contractor shall be selected by the prospective purchaser from a list of consultants in forestry and timber economics provided by the commissioner. If the commissioner requires a prospective purchaser to retain the services of a contractor under this subsection, the commissioner shall determine the scope of the work to be performed by the contractor.

Under this section, a performance review shall be completed not more than five years after a timber sale contract is entered into by the department to ensure that the purchaser is performing in accordance with the terms of the contract. If the commissioner determines that the purchaser is not performing in accordance with the contract, the commissioner may terminate the contract.

A timber sale negotiated under this section does not affect other timber harvest programs under AS

38.05.110

—

38.05.120

.

In this section,

“high value-added wood product” means interior finish paneling, trim molding, flooring, doors, windows, cabinet stock, furniture, musical instruments or parts of instruments, toys, tools and implements, ready-to-assemble building kits, veneer, plywood, finger-jointed lumber, faced house logs, dissolving pulp, engineered wood products, paneled wood products, kiln-dried lumber, and other similar finished wood products as determined by the commissioner to have received processing beyond sawing and planing that adds high value to the wood product;

“other value-added wood product” means round house logs, chips, green lumber, flitches, cants, rough planks, and other similar wood products as determined by the commissioner.

History.

(§ 2 ch 124 SLA 1996; am §§ 6, 7 ch 153 SLA 2003; am § 6 ch 1 SSSLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For timber and material sale procedures, see 11 AAC 71, art. 1.